Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 1
ESTABLISHMENT OF EDUCATOR ADVANCEMENT COUNCIL AND
LOCAL EDUCATOR NETWORKS, AND TECHNICAL CHANGES TO
NETWORK OF QUALITY TEACHING AND LEARNING AND
TO BEGINNING TEACHER AND ADMINISTRATOR PROGRAM
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2017 Act, “educator” means
a teacher, administrator or other school professional who is licensed,  registered or certified
by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(2)(a) The Educator Advancement Council is created,  as provided by ORS 190.010 (5) and
with the authority described in ORS 190.110, for the  purposes of providing resources related
to educator professional learning and other educator supports.
(b) The council shall function through an intergovernmental agreement, as provided  by
ORS 190.003 to 190.130. The intergovernmental agreement  shall outline the governance
framework and the  administrative details necessary for the efficient and effective imple-
mentation of the duties of the council.
(3)(a) The  council shall consist of members who are representatives of the members of
the intergovernmental agreement creating the council, including representatives  of state
agencies, school districts and education service districts.
(b) In addition to the members of the council specified in paragraph  (a) of this sub-
section, the council shall consist of members who are:
(A) Practicing educators, early learning providers and professionals and  school district
board members; and
(B) Representatives of educator preparation providers, education-focused nonprofit  or-
ganizations, education-focused philanthropic organizations, professional  education associ-
ations, community-based education organizations that represent families and students,
post-secondary institutions of education and federally recognized tribes of this state.
(c) The majority of the  members of the council identified under paragraphs (a) and (b)
of this subsection may identify additional members of the council.
(4) The council shall:
(a) Establish a system of educator networks,  as described in section 2 of this 2017 Act,
by which every educator in this state has access to professional learning opportunities; and
(b) Connect  educator networks and facilitate communications within and among the
networks to improve teaching and learning.
(5) The Chief Education Office shall provide support to the strategic direction of the
council by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to monitor:
(A) Teaching and learning conditions;
(B) Educator workforce supply and demand; and
(C) Common outcomes and measures anticipated to promote improvement in teaching
and learning.
(b) Assisting the council in coordinating and connecting  educator networks, supporting
professional learning priorities,  enabling access to professional learning and supports, lever-
aging funding sources and managing innovation funds.
(c) Recommending statutory and agency rule changes needed to support  the purposes of
the council.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Supporting a statewide plan for increasing:
(A) The supply of culturally diverse teacher candidates; and
(B) The successful recruitment of effective educators to work in high-need  schools and
in practice areas with a shortage of educators.
(f) Identifying high-leverage educator practices to be  developed by educators throughout
their careers.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 2
(g) Providing accountability of the council by ensuring that the council:
(A) Gives preference, when  making recommendations about funding distributions, to en-
tities that have demonstrated success in improving student indicators.
(B) Considers the delivery of services for the benefit  of all regions of this state when
establishing the system of educator networks.
(C) Works toward improving  student progress indicators identified by the Chief Educa-
tion Office or set forth in ORS 350.014.
(D) Includes and connects education providers and leaders from prekindergarten  through
post-secondary education.
(h) Providing staff support for the administrative functions of the council.
(6) The Department of Education shall provide support to the council by:
(a) Developing a system that allows for the statewide dissemination of emerging practices
and evidence-based models.
(b) Providing technical assistance to the council, including online systems for  sharing
professional learning resources and supporting educator networks.
(c) Administering the distribution of grant and contract funds for programs  described in
this section.
(d) Providing administrative support to the educator networks, including:
(A) Making recommendations to the Chief Education Office and the  council about the
selection of the sponsors of educator networks;
(B) Providing technical assistance to educator networks; and
(C) Entering into grant agreements or contracts for the distribution  of funds to educator
networks.
(7)(a) The Chief Education Office, the State Board of Education and the Teacher Stand-
ards and Practices Commission may adopt any rules necessary at the request of the council
to support the council or to perform  any duties assigned to the office, board or commission
under this section.
(b) The council may adopt rules pursuant to ORS  chapter 183 for the purpose of section
2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Educator Advancement Council shall establish a system of educator
networks, including prescribing characteristics of educator  networks and selecting the enti-
ties to serve as educator networks.
(2) An entity is eligible to sponsor an educator network if the entity:
(a) Is a school district, an education service district,  a nonprofit organization, a post-
secondary institution of education, a federally recognized tribe of this state or  a consortium
that is any combination of the entities described in this paragraph;
(b) Has demonstrated the  ability to oversee the use of funds in support of professional
development, mentoring or other direct supports to educators;
(c) Has demonstrated a commitment to equity-driven policies and practices;
(d) Has the capacity to coordinate services across the region served by the educator
network;
(e) Has demonstrated experience in developing and managing partnerships; and
(f) Has, or agrees to establish, a coordinating body for the educator network that  in-
cludes:
(A) A majority of educators who are  based in schools from different grades and content
areas and who are reflective of the student demographics of the region served by the  edu-
cator network; and
(B) Members representing state agencies, school districts, education service districts,
early learning providers  and professionals, school board members, educator preparation
providers, education-focused nonprofit organizations, education-focused philanthropic organ-
izations, professional education associations, community-based education organizations that
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 3
represent families and students,  post-secondary institutions of education and federally re-
cognized tribes of this state.
(3) Each educator network shall:
(a) Establish professional educator priorities that reflect local needs for each school and
school district served by the educator network based  on professional learning plans submit-
ted by educators;
(b) Ensure equitable access by educators to resources that are distributed through  the
council;
(c) Pursue state and other funds and resources on behalf of  the members of the educator
network and the educators served by the educator network; and
(d) Coordinate communications and accountability for resources  distributed through the
council to educators served by the educator network.
(4) When establishing professional educator  priorities that reflect local needs, each edu-
cator network shall strive to:
(a) Enhance a culture  of leadership and collaborative responsibility that elevates and
advances the teaching profession among professionals  employed by early learning services,
schools serving students in kindergarten through grade 12, education service districts, edu-
cator preparation providers, nonprofit organizations, professional associations and
community-based organizations.
(b) Enhance access for educators to high-quality professional learning that:
(A) Supports culturally responsive practices;
(B) Is guided by the needs of educators served by the educator network;
(C) Maximizes collaborative leadership among teachers and administrators; and
(D) Reflects professional learning standards.
(c) Strengthen and enhance existing evidence-based practices that improve  student
achievement and that reflect changing students needs and demographics.
(d) Improve the recruitment, preparation, induction and support of  educators at each
stage of the educators’ careers.
(e) Enhance  leadership and career advancement opportunities for teachers and increase
the perspectives of teachers in identifying priorities for funding educator professional learn-
ing and educator supports.
(5) Any school district, education service district or post-secondary  institution of educa-
tion that is a member of an educator network may serve as the fiscal agent for the  educator
network.
SECTION 3.
The Educator  Advancement Council shall submit a report on the progress
of the council toward  implementing the duties prescribed to the council by sections 1 and 2
of this 2017 Act to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to education
no later than January 15, 2018.
SECTION 4.  ORS 342.950, as amended by section 1, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended
to read:
342.950. (1) The Network of Quality Teaching and Learning is established. The network consists
of the Chief  Education Office and public and private entities that receive funding as provided by this
section to accomplish the purposes of the network described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The purposes of the network are the following:
(a) To enhance a culture of  leadership and collaborative responsibility for advancing the pro-
fession of  teaching among providers of early learning services, teachers and administrators in
kindergarten through grade 12, education service districts and educator preparation providers.
(b) To strengthen and  enhance existing evidence-based practices that improve student achieve-
ment, including practices advanced by or described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820,  329.824, 329.838,
342.433 to 342.449 and 342.805 to 342.937.
(c) To improve recruitment, preparation, induction, career  advancement opportunities and sup-
port of educators.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 4
(3) To accomplish the purposes of the network described in subsection (2)  of this section, the
Department of Education, subject to the direction and  control of the Chief Education Officer, shall
distribute funding as follows:
(a) To schools, school districts, education service  districts, nonprofit organizations, post-
secondary  institutions  and consortiums that are any combination of those entities for the purpose
of supporting the implementation and delivery of common  core state standards and other state
standards that indicate whether a student is prepared for college.
(b) To school districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for  the purpose
of providing teacher and administrator evaluations and aligned professional development in  a man-
ner that complies  with the core teaching standards adopted as provided by ORS 342.856 and with
related standards prescribed by federal law.
(c) To school districts and nonprofit organizations for the  purpose of providing teachers with
opportunities for professional collaboration and professional  development and for the pursuit of ca-
reer pathways in a manner that is consistent  with the School District Collaboration Grant Program
described in ORS 329.838.
(d) To school  districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for the purpose
of providing beginning teachers and administrators with mentors  in a manner that is consistent with
the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) To school districts, education service districts, nonprofit  organizations, post-secondary insti-
tutions and the tribes of this state for  the purpose of closing achievement gaps by providing and
improving the effectiveness of instruction and professional development, implementing  data-driven
decision making, supporting practice communities and implementing  culturally [ competent] respon-
sive practices.
(f) To school districts, nonprofit organizations and  post-secondary institutions for the purposes
of:
(A) Strengthening educator programs for educators at all levels to:
(i) Improve educator preparation, recruitment and leadership.
(ii) Advance the purposes of the Educators Equity  Act, to improve the cultural competence of
educators and to ensure educators are trained in culturally relevant educational practices.
(B) Supporting the development and sustainability of partnerships  between providers of early
learning services, public schools with any grades from kindergarten  through grade 12 and post-
secondary institutions.
(g) To school districts to ensure that a sufficient number of  kindergarten through grade five
teachers have received training to understand and recognize dyslexia and to  implement appropriate
instruction.
(h) To school  districts for the design and implementation of programs to provide profes-
sional development to educators on  strategies that decrease rates of school absenteeism
among students by using trauma-informed approaches in schools.
(4) The Chief Education Office shall provide strategic direction to the network by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to  determine best practices and evidence-based mod-
els.
(b) Convening [ an advisory group ] the Educator Advancement Council created by section 1
of this 2017 Act  to guide network activities and expand the implementation of effective practices.
(c) Working with educator programs to ensure ongoing collaboration with education providers.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Creating and supporting a statewide plan for increasing the successful recruitment of high-
ability and culturally diverse candidates to work in high-need communities and fields.
(5) The Department of Education shall support the network by:
(a) Developing a system that ensures statewide dissemination of  best practices and evidence-
based models.
(b) Supporting the development and implementation of  standards-based curriculum, high-leverage
practices  and assessments that promote student learning and improve student progress indicators for
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 5
students who are enrolled in an English language learner program under ORS 336.079 and for stu-
dents with disabilities.
(c) Administering the distribution of funding as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The Chief Education Office  shall develop processes to establish the network and ensure the
accountability of the network. The processes must ensure that the network:
(a) Gives preference  to entities that have demonstrated success in improving student progress
indicators.
(b) Delivers services for the benefit of all regions of this state.
(c) Is accountable for  improving student progress indicators identified by the Chief Education
Office or set forth in ORS 350.014.
(d) Includes and connects education providers and leaders from prekindergarten  through post-
secondary education.
(7) No more than two  percent of all moneys received for the purposes of this section may be
expended by the Chief Education Office or the Department of Education  for administrative costs
incurred under this section. For the  purpose of this subsection, the following are not considered
administrative costs:
(a) Technical  assistance and direct program services provided to school districts and nonprofit
organizations;  and
(b) Any administrative costs incurred under ORS 329.838 related to the administration  of the
School District Collaboration Grant Program.
(8) The State Board of Education may  adopt any rules necessary for the Department of Educa-
tion to support the  network and perform any duties assigned to the department under this section
or assigned to the department by the Chief Education Office. Any rules  adopted by the State Board
of Education must be consistent with this section and with  actions taken by the Chief Education
Office to implement this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 342.953 is amended to read:
342.953. (1) The Network of Quality Teaching and Learning  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Network of Quality
Teaching and Learning Fund shall  be credited to the [ General] Network of Quality Teaching and
Learning Fund.
(2) Moneys in the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund are  continuously appropri-
ated to the Department of  Education for the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning established
by ORS 342.950  and for the Educator Advancement Council created by section 1 of this 2017
Act.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants or  donations from public and private sources for the Network of Quality Teaching and
Learning or for the Educator Advancement Council . Moneys received under  this subsection shall
be deposited into the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund.
SECTION 6.  ORS 329.788 is amended to read:
329.788. As used in ORS 329.788 to 329.820:
(1) “Beginning administrator” means a principal or superintendent who:
(a) Possesses a preliminary administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards and  Prac-
tices Commission;
(b) Is employed as a principal or superintendent by a school district; and
(c) Has been assigned for fewer than two school years in the administrator’s present position.
(2) “Beginning teacher” means a teacher who:
(a) Possesses a preliminary  teaching license or reciprocal license issued by the Teacher Stand-
ards and Practices Commission;
(b) Is employed at least half-time, primarily as a classroom teacher, by a school district; and
(c) Has taught fewer  than two school years as a licensed probationary teacher in any public,
private or state-operated school  in any state .
(3) “Mentor” means an individual who:
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 6
(a) Is an acting or retired teacher, principal or superintendent;
(b) Has  met established best practice and research-based criteria as defined by the State Board
of Education by rule;
(c) Possesses a  teaching or administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices
Commission;
(d) Has successfully served for five or more years as a licensed teacher, principal or super-
intendent in any public school; and
(e) Has been selected and trained as described in ORS 329.815.
(4) “Mentorship program” means a program provided by  a mentor to a beginning teacher or
administrator that includes, but is not limited to, direct classroom observation and consultation,
assistance in instructional planning and preparation, support in implementation and  delivery of
classroom instruction, development of school leadership skills and other assistance intended to assist
the beginning teacher  or administrator to become a confident and competent professional educator
who makes a positive impact on student learning.
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FOR EARLY LEARNING
PROVIDERS AND FINANCIAL AID FOR
CERTAIN TEACHER CANDIDATES TO USE AT
EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROVIDERS
SECTION 7.
(1) The Early Learning Division,  under the direction of the Early Learning
Council and in collaboration with the Educator Advancement Council created by  section 1
of this 2017  Act, shall establish and implement policies and practices to achieve vigorous and
comprehensive early childhood professional development systems in this state that incorpo-
rate improved recruitment, preparation, induction, career advancement opportunities  and
support for  early learning providers and professionals, including professionals who provide
home visiting services.
(2) To achieve the objectives described in subsection (1)  of this section, the division shall
develop or expand:
(a) Strategies and partnerships  that connect early learning providers and professionals
with access to education pathways, including college credentials, degrees and certificates;
(b) Coaching and mentorship programs that  make available cohorts, mentors and quality
improvement specialists to advise, assist, educate and provide information to  early learning
providers and professionals;
(c) Professional  development tracking systems for the workforce for early learning to
ensure coverage of the necessary skills and knowledge required of early learning providers
and professionals, including professionals who provide home visiting services; and
(d) Collaborations that support exempt family child care providers,  as defined in ORS
329A.430, through the  advancement of research in child development, peer learning and
mentoring.
(3) The division shall collaborate with any state  agencies or other partners to achieve the
objectives described in subsection  (1) of this section and to carry out the provisions of sub-
section (2) of this section.
SECTION 8.
Section 9 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 348.
SECTION 9. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid authorized by law,
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission may award  scholarships to culturally and
linguistically diverse teacher candidates to use  at approved educator preparation providers,
as defined in ORS 342.120, for the purpose of advancing the goal described in ORS 342.437.
(2) Scholarships awarded under this section shall be  in amounts of $5,000 each academic
year, for a maximum of two academic years.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 7
(3) The commission shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation and  adminis-
tration of this  section in consultation with the Educator Advancement Council and the Chief
Education Office.
USE OF MONEYS BY LOCAL EDUCATOR NETWORKS
SECTION 10.  ORS 342.950, as amended by section 1,  chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2016, and section
4 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
342.950. (1) The Network of Quality Teaching and Learning is established. The network consists
of the Chief  Education Office and public and private entities that receive funding as provided by this
section to accomplish the purposes of the network described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The purposes of the network are the following:
(a) To enhance a culture of  leadership and collaborative responsibility for advancing the pro-
fession of  teaching among providers of early learning services, teachers and administrators in
kindergarten through grade 12, education service districts and educator preparation providers.
(b) To strengthen and  enhance existing evidence-based practices that improve student achieve-
ment, including practices advanced by or described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820,  329.824, 329.838,
342.433 to 342.449 and 342.805 to 342.937.
(c) To improve recruitment, preparation, induction, career  advancement opportunities and sup-
port of educators.
(3) To accomplish the purposes of the network described in subsection (2)  of this section, the
Department of Education, subject to the direction and  control of the Chief Education Officer, shall
distribute funding as follows:
(a) To schools, school districts,  education service districts, nonprofit organizations, post-
secondary institutions and consortiums that are any combination of those entities for the  purpose
of supporting the implementation and delivery of  common core state standards and other state
standards that indicate whether a student is prepared for college.
(b) To school  districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for the purpose
of providing teacher  and administrator evaluations and aligned professional development in a man-
ner that complies with the core teaching standards adopted as provided by ORS 342.856  and with
related standards prescribed by federal law.
(c) To school districts and nonprofit  organizations for the purpose of providing teachers with
opportunities for professional collaboration and professional development and  for the pursuit of ca-
reer pathways in a manner that is consistent  with the School District Collaboration Grant Program
described in ORS 329.838.
(d) To school districts, education service districts and nonprofit organizations for  the purpose
of providing beginning teachers and administrators with mentors  in a manner that is consistent with
the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program described in ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) To school districts,  education service districts, nonprofit organizations, post-secondary insti-
tutions and the tribes of this state for the purpose  of closing achievement gaps by providing and
improving the  effectiveness of instruction and professional development, implementing data-driven
decision making, supporting practice communities and implementing  culturally responsive practices.
(f) To school districts, nonprofit organizations and  post-secondary institutions for the purposes
of:
(A) Strengthening educator programs for educators at all levels to:
(i) Improve educator preparation, recruitment and leadership.
(ii) Advance the purposes of the Educators Equity  Act, to improve the cultural competence of
educators and to ensure educators are trained in culturally relevant educational practices.
(B) Supporting the development and sustainability of partnerships  between providers of early
learning services, public schools with any grades from kindergarten  through grade 12 and post-
secondary institutions.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 8
(g) To school districts to ensure that a sufficient number of  kindergarten through grade five
teachers have received training to understand and recognize dyslexia and to  implement appropriate
instruction.
(h) To school districts for the design and implementation of programs  to provide professional
development to educators on strategies that decrease rates of  school absenteeism among students
by using trauma-informed approaches in schools.
(i) To educator networks established under section 2 of this 2017 Act for the  purpose of
supporting educator networks.
(4) The Chief Education Office shall provide strategic direction to the network by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to determine  best practices and evidence-based mod-
els.
(b) Convening the Educator Advancement Council created by section 1 of this 2017 Act  to guide
network activities and expand the implementation of effective practices.
(c) Working with educator programs to ensure ongoing collaboration with education providers.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Creating and supporting a statewide plan for increasing the successful recruitment of high-
ability and culturally diverse candidates to work in high-need communities and fields.
(5) The Department of Education shall support the network by:
(a) Developing a system that ensures statewide dissemination of  best practices and evidence-
based models.
(b) Supporting the development and implementation of  standards-based curriculum, high-leverage
practices  and assessments that promote student learning and improve student progress indicators for
students who are enrolled in an English language learner program under ORS 336.079 and for stu-
dents with disabilities.
(c) Administering the distribution of funding as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The Chief Education Office shall develop processes to establish the  network and ensure the
accountability of the network. The processes must ensure that the network:
(a) Gives preference to entities that have demonstrated success in improving  student progress
indicators.
(b) Delivers services for the benefit of all regions of this state.
(c) Is accountable for improving student progress indicators identified by  the Chief Education
Office or set forth in ORS 350.014.
(d) Includes and  connects education providers and leaders from prekindergarten through post-
secondary education.
(7) No more than two percent of all moneys received for the purposes of  this section may be
expended by the Chief  Education Office or the Department of Education for administrative costs
incurred under this section. For the purpose of this subsection,  the following are not considered
administrative costs:
(a) Technical assistance and direct program services provided to school districts and  nonprofit
organizations; and
(b) Any administrative  costs incurred under ORS 329.838 related to the administration of the
School District Collaboration Grant Program.
(8) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules  necessary for the Department of Educa-
tion to support the network and perform any duties assigned to the department  under this section
or assigned to the department by the Chief Education Office. Any rules  adopted by the State Board
of Education must be consistent with this  section and with actions taken by the Chief Education
Office to implement this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 329.788, as amended by section 6 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
329.788. As used in ORS 329.788 to 329.820:
(1) “Beginning administrator” means a principal or superintendent who:
(a) Possesses  a preliminary administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards and Prac-
tices Commission;
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 9
(b) Is employed as a principal or superintendent by a school district; and
(c) Has been assigned for fewer than two school years in the administrator’s present position.
(2) “Beginning teacher” means a teacher who:
(a) Possesses a preliminary teaching license or reciprocal license issued by  the Teacher Stand-
ards and Practices Commission;
(b) Is employed at least half-time, primarily as a classroom teacher, by a school district; and
(c) Has taught fewer than two school years as a licensed probationary teacher  in any public,
private or state-operated school in any state.
(3) “Educator network” means an educator network established under section 2 of this
2017 Act.
[(3)] (4) “Mentor” means an individual who:
(a) Is an acting or retired teacher, principal or superintendent;
(b) Has met established best practice and research-based criteria as defined by the State  Board
of Education by rule;
(c) Possesses a  teaching or administrative license issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices
Commission;
(d) Has successfully served for five or more years as a licensed teacher, principal or super-
intendent in any public school; and
(e) Has been selected and trained as described in ORS 329.815.
[(4)] (5) “Mentorship program” means a program provided by  a mentor to a beginning teacher
or administrator that includes, but  is not limited to, direct classroom observation and consultation,
assistance in instructional  planning and preparation, support in implementation and delivery of
classroom instruction, development of school leadership skills and other assistance intended to assist
the beginning teacher or administrator to become a confident and competent  professional educator
who makes a positive impact on student learning.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 329.795 is amended to read:
329.795. (1) The State Board of Education shall establish a beginning teacher  and administrator
mentorship program to  provide eligible beginning teachers and administrators in this state with a
continued and sustained mentorship program from a formally assigned mentor.
(2) Any school district or educator network  is eligible to participate in the mentorship pro-
gram.
(3) A  school district may participate through an educator network or may  enter into a
partnership with another school district, an  institution of higher education, an education service
district or another organization to operate jointly a mentorship program if:
(a) All moneys received as grants-in-aid  for the mentorship program are administered by the
participating school district or educator network  to provide direct services to beginning teachers
and administrators; and
(b) All other requirements of ORS 329.788 to 329.820 are met.
(4) All programs in ORS 329.788 to 329.820 are subject to the availability of  funds appropriated
therefor.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 329.800 is amended to read:
329.800. (1)  Each school district or educator network  that wishes to participate in the begin-
ning teacher and administrator mentorship  program shall submit a formal application to the De-
partment of Education. The application shall include:
(a) A  description of the priorities to be addressed by moneys received by a school district or
an educator network  for the mentorship program, as described in ORS 329.805 (2);
(b) The names of all eligible beginning teachers and administrators employed by the  school dis-
trict or a school district  within the educator network  and a description of their assignments; and
(c) A description of the proposed mentorship program, which must provide  at least 75-90 hours
of frequent contact between the mentors and beginning teachers and administrators throughout the
school year.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 10
(2) The school district or educator network  shall certify  in the application that no eligible
beginning professional educators are or may be under a conditional  license, except as provided in
rules of the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
SECTION 14.  ORS 329.805 is amended to read:
329.805. (1) Subject to ORS 291.232  to 291.260, the Department of Education shall distribute
grants-in-aid to qualifying school districts or educator  networks  to offset the costs of beginning
teacher and administrator mentorship programs. A qualifying district or educator network  shall
receive annually an amount that is aligned with evidence-based best practices.
(2) If the funds are insufficient for all eligible proposals, the Department of  Education shall
award grants on a competitive basis, taking into consideration:
(a) The priorities to be addressed by moneys received by a school district  or  an educator
network, including efforts related to:
(A) Increasing the number of culturally and linguistically diverse educators hired; and
(B) Reflecting the demographics of the  students of the school district or school districts within
the educator network  with  the demographics of the educators of the school district  or school
districts within the educator network ; and
(b) Whether the school district is a small school district or serves a  rural community  or
whether the educator network serves small school districts or a rural community .
(3) The State  Board of Education may adopt such rules as it considers appropriate for the dis-
tribution of grants-in-aid under this section.
(4) A school district or an educator network  that is determined by the Department of Educa-
tion to be in violation of one or more of  the requirements of ORS 329.788 to 329.820 may be required
to refund all grants-in-aid moneys distributed under  ORS 329.788 to 329.820. The amount of penalty
shall be determined by the State Board of Education.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 329.815 is amended to read:
329.815. (1) Based on  the requirements of ORS 329.788 to 329.820, the selection, nature and ex-
tent of duties of mentors shall be determined [ by the school district. ]:
(a) By the  school district that is the employer of the teacher or administrator and of the
mentor; or
(b) Jointly by the school district that is the  employer of the teacher or administrator and
the school district that is the employer of the mentor.
(2) A teacher, principal or superintendent may not be designated as  a mentor unless willing to
perform in that role.
(3) For purposes of actions taken under ORS 342.805 to 342.937:
(a) A mentor may not participate  in the evaluation of a beginning teacher or administrator as-
signed to the mentor; and
(b) Any written or other reports of a mentor regarding a beginning teacher or administrator
assigned to the mentor may not be used in the evaluation of the beginning teacher  or administrator.
(4) Each mentor shall complete successfully training provided or approved by  the Department
of Education while participating in the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship program.
(5) The stipend received for each beginning teacher  or administrator may be used by the school
district or educator network  to compensate  mentors or to compensate other individuals assigned
duties to provide release time for teachers, principals or superintendents acting as mentors.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 329.820 is amended to read:
329.820. (1) The Department of Education shall be responsible for the regular and ongoing
evaluation  of  implementation and administration of programs under ORS 329.788 to 329.820 and may
contract for such evaluation. The department may  not expend in a biennium more than 2.5 percent
of the total amount of moneys available for the programs on the evaluation of the programs. The
evaluation may include assessments of the following:
(a) The effectiveness of the mentorship program in the retention of beginning teachers and  ad-
ministrators in [ the] a school district that has participated in the program  and in  the profession;
and
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 11
(b) Student performance on statewide and other assessments.
(2) The  department may accept contributions of moneys and assistance for the purpose of the
evaluation of programs from any source, public or private, and agree  to conditions placed on the
moneys not inconsistent with ORS 329.788 to 329.820. All moneys  received by the department under
this subsection shall be deposited into the Department of Education Account to be  used for the
evaluation of programs conducted under this section.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 329.838 is amended to read:
329.838. (1) The School District Collaboration Grant Program is established  to provide funding
for school districts or educator networks established under section 2  of this 2017 Act  to im-
prove student achievement through the voluntary collaboration of teachers and administrators to
design and implement new approaches to:
(a) Career pathways for teachers and administrators;
(b) Evaluation processes for teachers and administrators;
(c) Compensation models for teachers and administrators; and
(d) Enhanced professional development opportunities for teachers and administrators.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall ensure that  the grant program established by this
section  is  administered and may provide technical expertise to school districts or educator net-
works applying for or receiving a grant under this section.
(b) For the purpose of ensuring  that the grant program is administered, the department may
directly administer the grant  program or may enter into a contract with a nonprofit entity to ad-
minister the grant program.
(c) For the purpose  of providing technical expertise, the department may enter into contracts
with nonprofit entities that have experience  in designing and implementing approaches that are
similar to the approaches described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Each school district or educator network  may apply for a  grant under this section , but a
school district may receive grant funds under this section  only as a school district or
through an educator network . Applications may be for the  design or for the implementation of
an approach identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Prior to applying for a grant  as a school district or through an educator network , the
school district must receive the approval to apply for the grant from:
(a) The exclusive bargaining representative for the  teachers of the school district or, if the
teachers are not represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, from the teachers of  the
school district;
(b) The chairperson of the school district board; and
(c) The superintendent of the school district.
(5) Funding for  the grant program established by this section shall be provided through the
School District Collaboration Grant Account established by ORS 329.839.
(6) The amount of each grant shall be determined as follows:
(a) For grants that are for the design of an approach identified in subsection (1) of  this section
and that are awarded to a school district , the amount determined by the [ administrator of  the
grant program ] department based on:
(A) The application submitted by the school district;
(B) The portion of the total funds available for  grants that are for the design of an approach;
and
(C) Any other criteria  or limitations established by the State Board of Education by rule, which
may include a minimum amount or a maximum amount for a grant.
(b)(A) For grants that are for the implementation of an approach  identified in subsection (1) of
this section  and that are awarded to a school district , the Grant Amount = School district
ADMw 
×  (the total amount available for distribution for an implementation grant in  a fiscal year
through the  School District Collaboration Grant Program ÷  the total ADMw of the school districts
that receive an implementation grant for the fiscal year through the  School District Collaboration
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 12
Grant Program). For the purpose of the calculation made under this paragraph, ADMw  shall be
calculated as provided by ORS 327.013, 338.155 (1) and 338.165 (2).
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A)  of this paragraph, a school district may receive a grant
for an amount that is 10 percent more than the amount calculated under  subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph if the grant program administrator approves a school district’s supplemental plan to de-
sign and implement new approaches to improve student achievement that are in addition to the  ap-
proaches identified in subsection (1) of this section and that are research-based best practices.
(C) In addition to any amounts received under subparagraphs (A)  and (B) of this paragraph, a
school district that has an average daily membership of less than 1,500 may receive  a supplemental
amount of up to $50,000 if:
(i) The supplemental amount is used for expenses incurred in relation to a grant manager who:
(I) Manages the use of a grant received under this paragraph;
(II) Supports the school district’s committees related to the grant;
(III) Monitors and measures the implementation of new approaches funded by the grant;
(IV) Ensures timely and accurate communications with educators in the school district;
(V) Completes all Department of Education requirements related to the grant; and
(VI) Attends meetings and collaborates with other school districts; and
(ii) The total of the implementation grant and the  supplemental amount does not exceed
$150,000.
(c) For grants that are awarded to an educator  network, the amount determined by the
department based on:
(A) The application submitted by the educator network;
(B) The portion of the total funds available for grants  that are for educator networks;
and
(C) Any other criteria or limitations established by the State Board of Education by  rule,
which may include a minimum or maximum amount for a grant.
(7) Grants shall be awarded based on:
(a) The application submitted by the school district  or educator network ;
(b) Other funds received by  a school district or educator network  for a purpose identified in
subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) Any other criteria established by the State Board of Education by rule.
(8) Moneys received by a school district or an educator network  under this section must be
separately accounted for and may be used only to  provide funding for the purposes described in the
application submitted by the school district  or educator network .
(9) The department shall accumulate, evaluate and  publish student achievement results of school
districts receiving grants under this section as a school  district or through an educator network
to determine the effectiveness of the approaches designed  and implemented by the school districts
or educator networks  under the grant program.
(10)(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this  subsection, the State Board of Education may
adopt any rules necessary for the implementation of the grant program established by this section.
(b) The  board may not adopt any rules that establish statewide standards for the design and
implementation of the approaches described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 18.
The amendments to  ORS 329.788, 329.795, 329.800, 329.805, 329.815, 329.820,
329.838 and 342.950 by sections 10 to 17 of this 2017 Act become operative on June 30, 2018.
DISSOLUTION OF NETWORK OF QUALITY TEACHING AND LEARNING
SECTION 19. ORS 342.950 is repealed.
SECTION 20.  Section 1 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this  section and section 2 of this 2017 Act, “educator” means a teacher,
administrator or other school professional who is licensed, registered or  certified by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 13
(2)(a) The Educator Advancement Council is created, as provided by  ORS 190.010 (5) and with
the authority described in ORS 190.110, for the purposes of providing resources related to educator
professional learning and other educator supports.
(b) The  council shall function through an intergovernmental agreement, as provided by ORS
190.003 to 190.130. The intergovernmental  agreement shall outline the governance framework and
the administrative  details necessary for the efficient and effective implementation of the duties of
the council.
(3)(a) The council shall consist of members  who are representatives of the members of the
intergovernmental agreement creating the council, including representatives  of state agencies,
school districts and education service districts.
(b) In addition to the members of the council specified in paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the
council shall consist of members who are:
(A) Practicing educators, early learning providers and professionals and school district  board
members; and
(B) Representatives of educator  preparation providers, education-focused nonprofit organiza-
tions, education-focused  philanthropic organizations, professional education associations,
community-based education organizations that represent families  and students, post-secondary insti-
tutions of education and federally recognized tribes of this state.
(c) The majority of the members of the council identified under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection may identify additional members of the council.
(4) The council shall:
(a) Establish a system of educator networks, as described in section 2  of this 2017 Act, by which
every educator in this state has access to professional learning opportunities; [ and]
(b) Coordinate the distribution of moneys to educator networks from the Educator Ad-
vancement Fund based on the needs of the educators identified by the networks;
[(b)] (c) Connect educator networks and facilitate communications within and  among the net-
works to improve teaching and learning[ .]; and
(d) Continuously assess the  needs of educators in this state and coordinate priorities
based on the moneys available for distribution from the Educator Advancement Fund.
(5) The Chief Education Office shall provide support to the strategic direction of the council by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to monitor:
(A) Teaching and learning conditions;
(B) Educator workforce supply and demand; and
(C) Common  outcomes and measures anticipated to promote improvement in teaching and
learning.
(b) Assisting the council in coordinating and  connecting educator networks, supporting profes-
sional learning priorities, enabling access to professional  learning and supports, leveraging funding
sources and managing innovation funds.
(c) Recommending statutory and agency rule changes needed to support the purposes of  the
council.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Supporting a statewide plan for increasing:
(A) The supply of culturally diverse teacher candidates; and
(B) The successful recruitment of effective educators  to work in high-need schools and in prac-
tice areas with a shortage of educators.
(f) Identifying high-leverage educator practices to be developed by  educators throughout their
careers.
(g) Providing accountability of the council by ensuring that the council:
(A) Gives preference, when  making recommendations about funding distributions, to entities that
have demonstrated success in improving student indicators.
(B) Considers the delivery of services for the benefit of all regions of this state when establish-
ing the system of educator networks.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 14
(C) Works toward improving student progress indicators  identified by the Chief Education Office
or set forth in ORS 350.014.
(D) Includes and connects education providers and  leaders from prekindergarten through post-
secondary  education.
(h) Providing staff support for the administrative functions of the council.
(6) The Department of Education shall provide support to the council by:
(a) Developing a system that allows for the statewide  dissemination of emerging practices and
evidence-based models.
(b) Providing  technical assistance to the council, including online systems for sharing profes-
sional learning resources and supporting educator networks.
(c) Administering the distribution of grant and contract funds for  programs described in this
section.
(d) Providing administrative support to the educator networks, including:
(A) Making  recommendations to the Chief Education Office and the council about the selection
of the sponsors of educator networks;
(B) Providing technical assistance to educator networks; and
(C) Entering into grant agreements or contracts for the distribution of funds  to educator net-
works.
(7)(a) The Chief Education Office, the State Board of Education and the Teacher  Standards and
Practices Commission may adopt any rules necessary at the request of the council to  support the
council or to perform any duties assigned to the office, board or commission under this section.
(b) The council may adopt rules pursuant to  ORS chapter 183 for the purpose of section 2 of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 342.953, as amended by section 5 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
342.953. (1) The  [ Network of Quality Teaching and Learning ] Educator Advancement Fund is
established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by
the [ Network of Quality Teaching and Learning ] Educator Advancement  Fund shall be credited  to
the [ Network of Quality Teaching and Learning ] Educator Advancement  Fund.
(2) Moneys in the  [ Network of Quality Teaching and Learning ] Educator Advancement  Fund
are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education [ for the Network of Quality Teaching
and Learning established by  ORS 342.950 and ] for the Educator Advancement Council created by
section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants or donations from public and private  sources [ for the Network of Quality Teaching and
Learning or ] for the Educator Advancement Council. Moneys received  under this subsection shall
be deposited into the [ Network of Quality Teaching and Learning ] Educator Advancement  Fund.
SECTION 22.  ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on  behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private  sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and moneys received  as provided in para-
graph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101,  327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  school district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation  grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as
provided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 15
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases  to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination  or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund  to each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s general  purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous  school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned  from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund  shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in the  distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district  may not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount  of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium.  If the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department  of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does  not exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department  of Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125  (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall  transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount  of $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall  transfer [ $33] $39.5 million from the
State School Fund to  the [ Network of Quality Teaching and Learning ] Educator Advancement Fund
established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The  total amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by [ $5] $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school  districts from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by [ $14] $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by [ $14] $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in [ paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of ] this subsection
shall be adjusted by the  same percentage by which the [ amount appropriated to the State School
Fund for  that biennium is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as determined
by the Department of  Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal Officer ] instructions
furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204 direct the state  agencies to
adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS 291.216 (6)(a)(C) .
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the  State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language  Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from  the State
School Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section  and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 16
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development of  talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of  a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year,  the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to  the Small School District Supplement Fund established in section 3,
chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 23.  ORS  327.008, as amended by section 7, chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 81, Oregon  Laws 2014, section 2, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2015, section 38, chapter 245,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 2, chapter 555, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 11, chapter 604, Oregon Laws
2015, section 2, chapter  644, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 8, chapter 783, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on  behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private  sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and moneys received  as provided in para-
graph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101,  327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  school district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation  grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as
provided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases  to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination  or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund  to each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s general  purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous  school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned  from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund  shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in the  distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district  may not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount  of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium.  If the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department  of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does  not exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department  of Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125  (2)
to (6).
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 17
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall  transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount  of $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education  shall transfer [ $33] $39.5 million from the
State School Fund to  the [ Network of Quality Teaching and Learning ] Educator Advancement Fund
established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The  total amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by [ $5] $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school  districts from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by [ $14] $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by [ $14] $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified  in [ paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of ] this subsection
shall be adjusted by the same percentage by which the [ amount appropriated  to the State School
Fund for  that biennium is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as determined
by the Department of Education after consultation with the Legislative  Fiscal Officer ] instructions
furnished to state  agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204 direct the state agencies to
adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS 291.216 (6)(a)(C) .
(13) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language  Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal  year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section  and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education  may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide  administration of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education  may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to  increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
SECTION 24.
The amendments to ORS 327.008 and  342.953 and section 1 of this 2017 Act
by sections 20 to 23 of this 2017  Act and the repeal of ORS 342.950 by section 19 of this 2017
Act become operative on June 30, 2019.
SECTION 24a. The amendments to  ORS 327.008 (12)(c) by sections 22 and 23 of this 2017
Act shall first be used to adjust the amounts  identified in ORS 327.008 (12) for the 2019-2021
biennium.
HOUSEKEEPING RELATED TO DISSOLUTION OF
CHIEF EDUCATION OFFICE
SECTION 25. Section 1 of this 2017 Act, as amended by section 20 of this 2017 Act, is amended
to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this  section and section 2 of this 2017 Act, “educator” means a teacher,
administrator or other school professional who is licensed, registered or  certified by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
(2)(a) The Educator Advancement Council is created, as provided by  ORS 190.010 (5) and with
the authority described in ORS 190.110, for the purposes of providing resources related to educator
professional learning and other educator supports.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 18
(b) The  council shall function through an intergovernmental agreement, as provided by ORS
190.003 to 190.130. The intergovernmental  agreement shall outline the governance framework and
the administrative  details necessary for the efficient and effective implementation of the duties of
the council.
(3)(a) The council shall consist of members who are  representatives of the members of the
intergovernmental agreement creating the  council, including representatives of state agencies,
school districts and education service districts.
(b) In addition to the  members of the council specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
council shall consist of members who are:
(A) Practicing  educators, early learning providers and professionals and school district board
members; and
(B) Representatives of educator preparation providers,  education-focused nonprofit organiza-
tions, education-focused philanthropic organizations, professional education  associations,
community-based education organizations that represent  families and students, post-secondary insti-
tutions of education and federally recognized tribes of this state.
(c) The majority of the members of the council identified under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection may identify additional members of the council.
(4) The council shall:
(a) Establish a system of educator networks, as described in section 2  of this 2017 Act, by which
every educator in this state has access to professional learning opportunities;
(b) Coordinate the distribution of moneys to educator networks from the Educator  Advancement
Fund based on the needs of the educators identified by the networks;
(c) Connect educator networks and facilitate communications within  and among the networks
to improve teaching and learning; and
(d) Continuously assess the needs of educators in this state and coordinate priorities  based on
the moneys available for distribution from the Educator Advancement Fund.
(5) The [ Chief Education Office ] Department of Education  shall  provide support to the strate-
gic direction of the council by:
(a) Conducting and coordinating research to monitor:
(A) Teaching and learning conditions;
(B) Educator workforce supply and demand; and
(C) Common outcomes and measures anticipated to promote improvement in teaching  and
learning.
(b) Assisting the council in coordinating  and connecting educator networks, supporting profes-
sional learning priorities, enabling access to  professional learning and supports, leveraging funding
sources and managing innovation funds.
(c) Recommending  statutory and agency rule changes needed to support the purposes of the
council.
(d) Supporting programs that help to achieve the purposes of the Educators Equity Act.
(e) Supporting a statewide plan for increasing:
(A) The supply of culturally diverse teacher candidates; and
(B) The successful recruitment of effective educators to work  in high-need schools and in prac-
tice areas with a shortage of educators.
(f) Identifying high-leverage educator  practices to be developed by educators throughout their
careers.
(g) Providing accountability of the council by ensuring that the council:
(A) Gives preference, when  making recommendations about funding distributions, to entities that
have demonstrated success in improving student indicators.
(B) Considers the delivery of services for the benefit of all regions of this state when establish-
ing the system of educator networks.
(C) Works toward improving  student progress indicators identified by the [ Chief Education
Office] Department of Education  or set forth in ORS 350.014.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 19
(D) Includes and connects education providers and  leaders from prekindergarten through post-
secondary  education.
(h) Providing staff support for the administrative functions of the council.
[(6) The Department of Education shall provide support to the council by: ]
[(a)] (i) Developing a  system that allows for the statewide dissemination of emerging practices
and evidence-based models.
[(b)] (j) Providing technical  assistance to the council, including online systems for sharing pro-
fessional learning resources and supporting educator networks.
[(c)] (k) Administering the distribution of grant and contract funds  for programs described in
this section.
[(d)] (L) Providing administrative support to the educator networks, including:
(A) Making recommendations to [ the Chief Education Office  and] the council about the selection
of the sponsors of educator networks;
(B) Providing technical assistance to educator networks; and
(C) Entering into grant agreements or contracts for the distribution of funds  to educator net-
works.
[(7)(a)] (6)(a) [ The Chief Education Office, ] The State Board of  Education and the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission may adopt any rules necessary at the request of the  council
to support the council or to perform any duties  assigned to the [ office,] board or commission under
this section.
(b) The council may adopt rules pursuant to  ORS chapter 183 for the purpose of section 2 of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 26.
 Section 9 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid authorized  by law, the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission may award scholarships to culturally and  linguistically diverse
teacher candidates to use at  approved educator preparation providers, as defined in ORS 342.120,
for the purpose of advancing the goal described in ORS 342.437.
(2) Scholarships awarded under this section shall be in amounts of $5,000  each academic year,
for a maximum of two academic years.
(3) The commission  shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation and administration of this
section in consultation with the Educator Advancement Council and the [ Chief Education Office ]
Department of Education .
SECTION 27.  Section 72, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 14, chapter
682, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 20, chapter 763, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 72.  (1)(a) Section 1, chapter 519, Oregon Laws 2011, as amended by section  8, chapter 519,
Oregon Laws 2011, sections 20 and 21, chapter 36, Oregon Laws 2012,  and section 1, chapter 774,
Oregon Laws 2015, is repealed on June 30, 2019.
(b) Section 2, chapter 519, Oregon  Laws 2011, as amended by section 1, chapter 36, Oregon Laws
2012, section 29, chapter  747, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 4, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, is
repealed on June 30, 2019.
(c) Section 3,  chapter 519, Oregon Laws 2011, as amended by section 5, chapter 774, Oregon
Laws 2015, is repealed on June 30, 2019.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 326.021 by section 42, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become op-
erative on June 30, 2019.
(3) The amendments to ORS 326.300 by section 43, chapter 774, Oregon Laws  2015, become op-
erative on June 30, 2019.
(4) The amendments to  ORS 326.425 by section 44, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become op-
erative on June 30, 2019.
(5) The amendments to ORS 326.430 by section 45, chapter 774, Oregon Laws  2015, become op-
erative on June 30, 2019.
(6) The amendments to  ORS 326.500 by section 46, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become op-
erative on June 30, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 20
(7) The amendments to ORS 327.380 by section 8, chapter 739, Oregon Laws 2013,  become op-
erative on June 30, 2019.
(8) The amendments to ORS 327.800 by section 67a,  chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(9) The amendments to ORS 327.810 by  section 68a, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(10) The amendments to ORS 327.815 by  section 69a, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(11) The amendments to ORS 327.820 by section 70a,  chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(12) The amendments to ORS 342.208 by section 53, chapter  774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(13) The amendments to ORS 342.350  by section 54, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(14) The amendments to ORS 342.410 by section 55, chapter  774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(15) The amendments to ORS 342.443  by section 56, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(16) The amendments to ORS 342.448 by section 76a, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015,  be-
come operative on June 30, 2019.
[(16) The amendments to ORS 342.950 by  section 57, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, and section
8c, chapter 790, Oregon Laws 2015, become operative on June 30, 2019. ]
(17) The amendments to ORS 344.059 and 344.141 by sections 13 and  14, chapter 763,
Oregon Laws 2015, become operative on June 30, 2019.
[(17) The amendments to ORS 351.077 by section 75a, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, become op-
erative on June 30, 2019. ]
[(18) The amendments to ORS 351.203 by section 58, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015,  become op-
erative on June 30, 2019. ]
[(19)] (18) The amendments to ORS [ 351.725] 350.065 by section 60, chapter 774, Oregon Laws
2015, become operative on June 30, 2019.
[(20)] (19) The amendments to ORS [ 351.735] 350.075 by section 61, chapter 774, Oregon Laws
2015, become operative on June 30, 2019.
(20) The amendments to ORS 350.100 by section 75a, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015,  be-
come operative on June 30, 2019.
(21) The amendments to ORS 352.018 by section 58, chapter 774, Oregon  Laws 2015, be-
come operative on June 30, 2019.
[(21)] (22)  The amendments to ORS 417.796 by section 62, chapter 774, Oregon Laws  2015, be-
come operative on June 30, 2019.
[(22)] (23) The  amendments to ORS 417.847 by section 63, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, be-
come operative on June 30, 2019.
[(23)] (24)  The amendments to ORS 417.852 by section 64, chapter 774, Oregon Laws  2015, be-
come operative on June 30, 2019.
[(24)] (25) The  amendments to ORS 660.324 by section 65, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, be-
come operative on June 30, 2019.
[(25) The amendments  to section 11, chapter 188, Oregon Laws 2015, by section 76a, chapter 774,
Oregon Laws 2015, become operative on June 30, 2019. ]
(26) The amendments to section 1 of this 2017 Act by section  25 of this 2017 Act become
operative on June 30, 2019.
(27) The amendments to section 9 of  this 2017 Act by section 26 of this 2017 Act become
operative on June 30, 2019.
[(26)] (28) Section 8, chapter 85, Oregon Laws 2014, becomes operative on June 30, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 21
[(27) The  amendments to sections 11 and 12 of this 2015 Act by sections 13 and 14 of this 2015
Act become operative on June 30, 2019. ]
CAPTIONS
SECTION 28. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 29. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 182 (SB 182-B) Page 22